Utah statutes.
31A-37-303.   Reinsurance.

(1)  A captive insurance company may provide reinsurance, as authorized in this title, on risks ceded by any other insurer.

(2) (a)  A captive insurance company may take credit for reserves on risks or portions of risks ceded to reinsurers if the captive insurance company complies with Section 31A-17-404.

(b)  Unless the reinsurer is in compliance with Section 31A-17-404, a captive insurance company may not take credit for:

(i)  reserves on risks ceded to a reinsurer; or

(ii)  portions of risks ceded to a reinsurer.

